Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 5
NUCLEAR MATERIALS PERMIT SYSTEM

42-20-501. Nuclear materials transportation permit required - application.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2021.]

No transportation of nuclear materials shall take place in, to, from, or through this state until the commission issues a permit, in accordance with the provisions of this section, which is not inconsistent with federal law, authorizing the applicant to operate or move upon public roads of this state a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles which carry nuclear materials.

Each carrier desiring to transport nuclear materials shall submit a permit application, in the form designated by the commission, to the commission prior to beginning such transportation.

42-20-501. Nuclear materials transportation permit required - application.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2021.]

No transportation of nuclear materials shall take place in, to, from, or through this state until the department of transportation issues a permit, in accordance with the provisions of this section, which is not inconsistent with federal law, authorizing the applicant to operate or move upon public roads of this state a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles which carry nuclear materials.

Each carrier desiring to transport nuclear materials shall submit a permit application, in the form designated by the department of transportation, to the department before beginning such transportation.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2534, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-118), ch. 155, p. 666, § 8, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-501 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-502. Permits - fees.

Each permit issued pursuant to section 42-20-501 shall be valid for one year following its issuance and shall be issued after approval of the carrier's permit application and upon payment of a five-hundred-dollar permit fee. In addition to the permit fee, each carrier shall pay a two-hundred-dollar fee for each shipment. The shipment fee shall be paid either by mail, in which case it must be postmarked at least seven days before the shipment is to be made, or at the time the shipment enters the state at the port of entry weigh station nearest the point at which the shipment enters the state. If the shipment originates in this state, payment shall be made at the port of entry weigh station nearest the point of origination of the shipment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2534, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-502 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-503. Carrying of shipping papers.

Any person transporting nuclear materials in this state shall carry a copy of the shipping papers required in 49 CFR part 172, subpart C.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2534, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-503 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-504. Rules and regulations.

The chief is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations which are necessary or desirable in governing the issuance of permits if such rules and regulations are not in conflict with or inconsistent with federal rules and regulations.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2534, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-504 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-505. Penalties - permit system.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2021.] The investigative personnel of the commission, a Colorado state patrol officer, or a port of entry officer, as defined in section 42-8-102 (3), may assess a civil penalty of one thousand dollars against a carrier who transports nuclear materials without first obtaining a nuclear materials transportation permit.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2021.

]

A Colorado state patrol officer or a port of entry officer, as defined in section 42-8-102 (3), may assess a civil penalty of one thousand dollars against a carrier who transports nuclear materials without first obtaining a nuclear materials transportation permit.

A carrier who misrepresents information in the carrier's application for a nuclear materials transportation permit, violates the terms of the permit, or commits a second violation of subsection (1) of this section within one calendar year shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than three thousand dollars.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until January 1, 2021.] The penalties in subsection (1) of this section shall be assessed upon an action brought by the commission or the Colorado state patrol in accordance with the procedure set forth in section 42-20-406.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective January 1, 2021.

]

The penalties in subsection (1) of this section shall be assessed upon an action brought by the Colorado state patrol in accordance with the procedure set forth in section 42-20-406.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2534, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 1654, § 51, effective June 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1019), ch. 135, p. 473, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 20-118), ch. 155, p. 666, § 9, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-505 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-506. Permit suspension and revocation.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2021.

]

In addition to any other civil or criminal penalties, the commission may suspend the nuclear materials transportation permit of any carrier for a period not to exceed six months or revoke such permit for failure to comply with the permit terms, misrepresentation of information in the permit application, failure to pay a civil penalty assessed pursuant to section 42-20-406, or failure to comply with the regulations promulgated pursuant to parts 4 and 5 of this article. The permit may be suspended or revoked only for good cause shown after due notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105, C.R.S., if requested by the carrier.

42-20-506. Permit suspension and revocation.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2021.

]

In addition to any other civil or criminal penalties, the department of transportation may suspend the nuclear materials transportation permit of any carrier for a period not to exceed six months or revoke the permit for failure to comply with the permit terms, misrepresentation of information in the permit application, failure to pay a civil penalty assessed pursuant to section 42-20-406, or failure to comply with the regulations promulgated pursuant to parts 4 and 5 of this article 20. The permit may be suspended or revoked only for good cause shown after due notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105, if requested by the carrier.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2535, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-118), ch. 155, p. 666, § 10, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-506 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-507. Local government preemption.

No county, city and county, city, or town shall establish any permit or fee system for the transportation of nuclear materials by motor vehicle or railcar in, to, from, or through this state.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2535, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-507 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-508. Route designation - motor vehicles.

The chief of the Colorado state patrol shall have the authority to adopt rules to designate which state highways shall be used and which shall not be used by motor vehicles transporting nuclear materials in this state.

The carrier shall not deviate from the routes designated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section except in order to make local pickups and deliveries and in cases of emergency conditions which would make continued use of the designated route unsafe, or to refuel, or when the designated route is closed due to road conditions, road construction, or maintenance operations. When making local pickups and deliveries or when refueling, the carrier shall remain on the routes designated by the Colorado state patrol and shall minimize the distance traveled on nondesignated routes.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2535, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-508 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-509. Strict liability for nuclear incidents.

Any person who causes the release of any nuclear material being transported shall be strictly liable for all injuries and damages resulting therefrom. The conduct of the claimant shall not be a defense to liability; except that this section does not waive any defense based on the claimant's failure to mitigate damages or related to any injury or damage to the claimant or the claimant's property which is intentionally sustained by the claimant or which results from the release of any nuclear material being transported intentionally and wrongfully caused by the claimant.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2535, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-509 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-510. Statute of limitations.

No person who has been injured or damaged as a result of a nuclear incident shall be precluded from bringing a suit against the person or persons responsible for causing the nuclear incident if such suit is instituted within three years after the date on which the injured person first knew, or reasonably could have known, of his or her injury or damage and the cause thereof; except that such suit must be brought within forty years after the date of the nuclear incident.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2535, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-510 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-511. Nuclear materials transportation fund.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2021.

]

All moneys collected pursuant to parts 4 and 5 of this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who, in addition to any excess moneys transferred from the motor carrier fund pursuant to section 40-2-110.5 (9), C.R.S., shall credit the same to the nuclear materials transportation fund, which fund is hereby created. The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the administration of parts 4 and 5 of this article.

42-20-511. Nuclear materials transportation fund.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2021.

]

All money collected pursuant to parts 4 and 5 of this article 20 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the nuclear materials transportation fund, which fund is hereby created. The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the administration of parts 4 and 5 of this article 20.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2536, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1095, § 6, effective August 7.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-118), ch. 155, p. 667, § 11, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-511 as it existed prior to 1994.